hunspell/hy_AM.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY անմիողտեըցկչյԱՆՄԻՈՂՏԵԸՑԿՉՅ
FLAG long
NEEDAFFIX 00
WORDCHARS '՛՜՞
IGNORE ՛՜՞
FORBIDDENWORD XX

PFX GU Y 2
PFX GU	0	կը+/PR	[^աեէոօիը]
PFX GU   0     կ'/PR    [աեէոօիը]   


PFX CH Y 1
PFX CH   0     չ/PR           .

SFX DE Y 9
SFX DE   0       ս          [^յ]
SFX DE   0       դ          [^յ] .
SFX DE 	0	ը	[^յ]
SFX DE	0	ը	[^ո]ւ	          
SFX DE 	0	ը	[^աեէիոօւ]
SFX DE   0      ն           .
SFX DE  յ	ն	.
SFX DE  յ	ս	.
SFX DE  յ	դ	.

# հայը
SFX DY Y 4
SFX DY յ	յն	.
SFX DY յ	յս	.
SFX DY յ	յդ	.
SFX DY յ	յը	.

# polysyllabics
SFX PP Y 1
SFX PP   0     ներ/DEABGEINLO [^յ]


#vowelreduction plurals
SFX PX Y 54
SFX PX	իկ	կեր/DEABGEINLO  .
SFX PX  ուկ     կներ/DEABGEINLO  .
SFX PX  ումբ	մբեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX  ունդ	նդեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX  ուզ	զեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX  ուրդ	րդեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX  իզբ	զբներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX   ուն     ներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX   իթ     թեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX  ուղթ	ղթեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իծ	ծեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուծ	ծեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուխ	խեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունկ	նկեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունձ	նձեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուրձ	րձեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինձ	նձեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իղ	ղեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իճ	ճեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ին	ներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուն	ներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իշ		շեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուշ		շեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինչ		նչեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունչ		նչեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինջ		նջեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունջ		նջեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իսպ		սպեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իս		սեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուրջ		րջեր/DEABGEINLO  .
SFX PX իչ		չեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իջ		ջեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իռ		ռեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուռ		ռեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իտ		տեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուտ		տեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իւ		ուեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իր		րեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուր		րեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իշտ		շտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իշտ		սhttp://start.ubuntu.com/9.04/տեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուշտ		շտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իրտ		րտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուրտ		րտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ից		ցեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուց		ցեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իտք		տքեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուտք		տքեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իրք		րքեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինք		նքեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինդ		նդեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուփ		փեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուք		քեր/DEABGEINLO . 
SFX PX դուռ		դռներ/DEABGEINLO . 

# polysyllabics յ
SFX PH Y 1
SFX PH   յ     ներ/DEABGEINLO	.

# monosyllabic
SFX PM Y 1
SFX PM   0     եր/DEABGEINLO          .

# collectives
SFX PZ Y 6
SFX PZ 0	ենք/DE .
SFX PZ 0	ենց/DE .
SFX PZ ա	այենք/DE .
SFX PZ ա	այենց/DE .
SFX PZ օ	ոյենք/DE .
SFX PZ օ	ոյենց/DE .

  # ablative 
SFX AB Y 5
SFX AB 	0	ից	.
SFX AB 	0	իցս	.
SFX AB 	0	իցդ	.
SFX AB 	0	իցը	.
SFX AB	0	իցն	.

# ablative  իկ-կից
SFX AX Y 55
SFX AX  իկ	կից/DE .
SFX AX  ուկ	կից/DE .
SFX AX  ումբ	մբից/DE .
SFX AX  ունդ	նդից/DE .
SFX AX  ուրդ	րդից/DE .
SFX AX  իզբ	զբից/DE .
SFX AX  իթ		թից/DE .
SFX AX  ուզ	զից/DE  .
SFX AX  ուղթ	ղթից/DE  .
SFX AX իժ		ժից/DE  .
SFX AX իծ		ծից/DE .
SFX AX ուծ		ծից/DE .
SFX AX ուխ		խից/DE  .
SFX AX ունկ		նկից/DE . 
SFX AX ունձ		նձից/DE .
SFX AX ուրձ		րձից/DE .
SFX AX ինձ		նձից/DE .
SFX AX իղ		ղից/DE .
SFX AX իճ		ճից/DE .
SFX AX ին		նից/DE .
SFX AX ուն		նից/DE .
SFX AX իշ		շից/DE .
SFX AX ուշ		շից/DE .
SFX AX ինչ		նչից/DE .
SFX AX ունչ		նչից/DE .
SFX AX ինջ		նջից/DE .
SFX AX ունջ		նջից/DE .
SFX AX իսպ		սպից/DE .
SFX AX իս		սից/DE .
SFX AX ուրջ		րջից/DE  .
SFX AX իչ		չից/DE .
SFX AX իջ		ջից/DE .
SFX AX իռ		ռից/DE .
SFX AX ուռ		ռից/DE .
SFX AX իտ		տից/DE .
SFX AX ուտ		տից/DE .
SFX AX իւ		ուից/DE .
SFX AX իր		րից/DE .
SFX AX ուր		րից/DE .
SFX AX իշտ		շտից/DE .
SFX AX իստ		ստից/DE .
SFX AX ուշտ		շտից/DE .
SFX AX իրտ		րտից/DE .
SFX AX ուրտ		րտից/DE .
SFX AX ից		ցից/DE .
SFX AX ուց		ցից/DE .
SFX AX իտք		տքից/DE .
SFX AX ուտք		տքից/DE .
SFX AX իրք		րքից/DE .
SFX AX ինք		նքից/DE .
SFX AX ինդ		նդից/DE .
SFX AX ուփ		փից/DE .
SFX AX ուք		քից/DE . 
SFX AX էջ		իջից/DE .
SFX AX դուռ		դռնից/DE .


# ablative ուանից
SFX AA Y 5
SFX AA 	0	ուանից	.
SFX AA 	0	ուանիցս	.
SFX AA 	0	ուանիցդ	.
SFX AA 	0	ուանիցը	.
SFX AA	0	ուանիցն	.

# ablative  շաբթի
#SFX AC Y 5
#SFX AC 	ի	ուանից	.
#SFX AC 	ի	ուանիցս	.
#SFX AC 	ի	ուանիցդ	.
#SFX AC 	ի	ուանիցը	.
#SFX AC		ի	ուանիցն	.

# ablative  ուց  ձիուց  եկեղեցուց
SFX A2 Y 6
SFX A2 	0	ուց	.
SFX A2 	ի	ուց/DE	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցս	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցդ	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցն	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցը	.

# ayi, oyi
SFX A4 Y 3
SFX A4  ա	այից/DE	.
SFX A4  օ	ոյից/DE	.
SFX A4  ո	ոյից/DE	.


# genitive
SFX GE Y 5
SFX GE	0	ի	.
SFX GE	0	իս	.
SFX GE 	0	իդ	.
SFX GE 	0	ին       .
SFX GE  իկ	կի/DE	.

# ձիու
SFX G2 Y 5
SFX G2	0	ու	.
SFX G2	0	ուս	.
SFX G2	0	ուդ	.
SFX G2	0	ուն	.
SFX G2	ի	ու/DE	.

# միութեան, արեան
SFX G1 Y 2
SFX G1   իւն	եան/DE           .
SFX G1	0	եան/DE		.

# ayi, oyi
SFX G4 Y 3
SFX G4  ա	այի/DE	.
SFX G4  օ	ոյի/DE	.
SFX G4  ո	ոյի/DE	.

# օր
SFX G7 Y 3
SFX G7   այր	օր/DEABINLO           .
SFX G7   էր	օր/DEABINLO           .
SFX G7 	ուստր	ստեր/DE   .


# ոջ
SFX G8 	Y 5
SFX G8  0	ոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8 ոյր	րոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8	էր	իրոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8	ին	նոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8  ուր	րոջ/DEABINLO .

# ման
SFX G9 	Y 1
SFX G9  ում	ման/DE	.	

# ուայ
SFX GA Y 4
SFX GA	0	ուայ	.
SFX GA	0	ուաս	.
SFX GA	0	ուադ	.
SFX GA	0	ուան/ABINLO	.

# ուայ  շաբթի
SFX GC Y 4
SFX GC	ի	ուայ	.
SFX GC	ի	ուաս	.
SFX GC	ի	ուադ	.
SFX GC	ի	ուան/ABINLO	.

# ան  լեռան
SFX GD Y 3
SFX GD	0	ան/DE	.
SFX GD	ուն	ան/DE	.
SFX GD	ուկ	կան/DE	.

#Gen.sg. vowel reductions
SFX GX  Y   55 
SFX GX  իկ	կի/DE
SFX GX  ուկ	կի/DE
SFX GX  ումբ	մբի/DE
SFX GX  ունդ	նդի/DE
SFX GX  ուրդ	րդի/DE
SFX GX  իզբ	զբի/DE
SFX GX  իթ		թի/DE
SFX GX  ուզ	զի/DE  .
SFX GX  ուղթ	ղթի/DE  .
SFX GX իժ		ժի/DE  .
SFX GX իծ		ծի/DE .
SFX GX ուծ		ծի/DE .
SFX GX ուխ		խի/DE  .
SFX GX ունկ		նկի/DE . 
SFX GX ունձ		նձի/DE .
SFX GX ուրձ		րձի/DE .
SFX GX ինձ		նձի/DE .
SFX GX իղ		ղի/DE .
SFX GX իճ		ճի/DE .
SFX GX ին		նի/DE .
SFX GX ուն		նի/DE .
SFX GX իշ		շի/DE .
SFX GX ուշ		շի/DE .
SFX GX ինչ		նչի/DE .
SFX GX ունչ		նչի/DE .
SFX GX ինջ		նջի/DE .
SFX GX ունջ		նջի/DE .
SFX GX իսպ		սպի/DE .
SFX GX իս		սի/DE .
SFX GX ուրջ		րջի/DE  .
SFX GX իչ		չի/DE .
SFX GX իջ		ջի/DE .
SFX GX իռ		ռի/DE .
SFX GX ուռ		ռի/DE .
SFX GX իտ		տի/DE .
SFX GX ուտ		տի/DE .
SFX GX իւ		ուի/DE .
SFX GX իր		րի/DE .
SFX GX ուր		րի/DE .
SFX GX իշտ		շտի/DE .
SFX GX իստ		ստի/DE .
SFX GX ուշտ		շտի/DE .
SFX GX իրտ		րտի/DE .
SFX GX ուրտ		րտի/DE .
SFX GX ից		ցի/DE .
SFX GX ուց		ցի/DE .
SFX GX իտք		տքի/DE .
SFX GX ուտք		տքի/DE .
SFX GX իրք		րքի/DE .
SFX GX ինք		նքի/DE .
SFX GX ինդ		նդի/DE .
SFX GX ուփ		փի/DE .
SFX GX ուք		քի/DE . 
SFX GX էջ		իջի/DE . 
SFX GX դուռ		դռան/DE .


# instrumental
SFX IN Y 5
SFX IN   0     ով/DE          .
SFX IN   0     ովս          .
SFX IN   0     ովդ          .
SFX IN   0     ովն          .
SFX IN   0     ովը          .

# instrumental իկ-կով
SFX Ik Y 1
SFX Ik	իկ	կով/DE	.

# միութեամբ, արեամբ
SFX I1 Y 1
SFX I1   իւն	եամբ/DE          .

# լուծմամբ
SFX I3 Y 1
SFX I3	ում	մամբ/DE	.

# եկեղեցով
SFX I2 Y 1
SFX I2	ի	ով/DE	.

# ayi, oyi
SFX I4 Y 3
SFX I4  ա	այով/DE	.
SFX I4  օ	ոյով/DE	.
SFX I4  ո	ոյով/DE	.


# instrumental with vowel reduction
SFX IX Y 55
SFX IX  իկ	կով/DE .
SFX IX  ուկ	կով/DE .
SFX IX  ումբ	մբով/DE .
SFX IX  ունդ	նդով/DE .
SFX IX  ուրդ	րդով/DE .
SFX IX  իզբ	զբով/DE .
SFX IX  իթ		թով/DE .
SFX IX  ուզ	զով/DE  .
SFX IX  ուղթ	ղթով/DE  .
SFX IX իժ		ժով/DE  .
SFX IX իծ		ծով/DE .
SFX IX ուծ		ծով/DE .
SFX IX ուխ		խով/DE  .
SFX IX ունկ		նկով/DE . 
SFX IX ունձ		նձով/DE .
SFX IX ուրձ		րձով/DE .
SFX IX ինձ		նձով/DE .
SFX IX իղ		ղով/DE .
SFX IX իճ		ճով/DE .
SFX IX ին		նով/DE .
SFX IX ուն		նով/DE .
SFX IX իշ		շով/DE .
SFX IX ուշ		շով/DE .
SFX IX ինչ		նչով/DE .
SFX IX ունչ		նչով/DE .
SFX IX ինջ		նջով/DE .
SFX IX ունջ		նջով/DE .
SFX IX իսպ		սպով/DE .
SFX IX իս		սով/DE .
SFX IX ուրջ		րջով/DE  .
SFX IX իչ		չով/DE .
SFX IX իջ		ջով/DE .
SFX IX իռ		ռով/DE .
SFX IX ուռ		ռով/DE .
SFX IX իտ		տով/DE .
SFX IX ուտ		տով/DE .
SFX IX իւ		ուով/DE .
SFX IX իր		րով/DE .
SFX IX ուր		րով/DE .
SFX IX իշտ		շտով/DE .
SFX IX իստ		ստով/DE .
SFX IX ուշտ		շտով/DE .
SFX IX իրտ		րտով/DE .
SFX IX ուրտ		րտով/DE .
SFX IX ից		ցով/DE .
SFX IX ուց		ցով/DE .
SFX IX իտք		տքով/DE .
SFX IX ուտք		տքով/DE .
SFX IX իրք		րքով/DE .
SFX IX ինք		նքով/DE .
SFX IX ինդ		նդով/DE .
SFX IX ուփ		փով/DE .
SFX IX ուք		քով/DE .
SFX IX էջ		իջով/DE .
SFX IX դուռ		դռնով/DE  . 

 
# locative
SFX LO Y 5
SFX LO 	0	ում/DE	.
SFX LO 	0	ումս	.
SFX LO 	0	ումդ	.
SFX LO 	0	ումն	.
SFX LO 	0	ումը	.

# locative  եկեղեցում
SFX L2 Y 1
SFX L2 	ի	ում/DE	.

# locative  with vowel reduction
SFX LX Y 55
SFX LX  իկ	կում/DE .
SFX LX  ուկ	կում/DE .
SFX LX  ումբ	մբում/DE .
SFX LX  ունդ	նդում/DE .
SFX LX  ուրդ	րդում/DE .
SFX LX  իզբ	զբում/DE .
SFX LX  իթ		թում/DE .
SFX LX  ուզ	զում/DE  .
SFX LX  ուղթ	ղթում/DE  .
SFX LX իժ		ժում/DE  .
SFX LX իծ		ծում/DE .
SFX LX ուծ		ծում/DE .
SFX LX ուխ		խում/DE  .
SFX LX ունկ		նկում/DE . 
SFX LX ունձ		նձում/DE .
SFX LX ուրձ		րձում/DE .
SFX LX ինձ		նձում/DE .
SFX LX իղ		ղում/DE .
SFX LX իճ		ճում/DE .
SFX LX ին		նում/DE .
SFX LX ուն		նում/DE .
SFX LX իշ		շում/DE .
SFX LX ուշ		շում/DE .
SFX LX ինչ		նչում/DE .
SFX LX ունչ		նչում/DE .
SFX LX ինջ		նջում/DE .
SFX LX ունջ		նջում/DE .
SFX LX իսպ		սպում/DE .
SFX LX իս		սում/DE .
SFX LX ուրջ		րջում/DE  .
SFX LX իչ		չում/DE .
SFX LX իջ		ջում/DE .
SFX LX իռ		ռում/DE .
SFX LX ուռ		ռում/DE .
SFX LX իտ		տում/DE .
SFX LX ուտ		տում/DE .
SFX LX իւ		ւում/DE .
SFX LX իր		րում/DE .
SFX LX ուր		րում/DE .
SFX LX իշտ		շտում/DE .
SFX LX իշտ		ստում/DE .
SFX LX ուշտ		շտում/DE .
SFX LX իրտ		րտում/DE .
SFX LX ուրտ		րտում/DE .
SFX LX ից		ցում/DE .
SFX LX ուց		ցում/DE .
SFX LX իտք		տքում/DE .
SFX LX ուտք		տքում/DE .
SFX LX իրք		րքում/DE .
SFX LX ինք		նքում/DE .
SFX LX ինդ		նդում/DE .
SFX LX ուփ		փում/DE .
SFX LX ուք		քում/DE .
SFX LX էջ		իջում/DE . 
SFX LX դուռ		դռնում/DE  .

# ayi, oyi
SFX L4 Y 3
SFX L4  ա	այում/DE	.
SFX L4  օ	ոյում/DE	.
SFX L4  ո	ոյում/DE

#present
SFX	VA	Y 25
SFX	VA	լ	մ/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	լ	ս/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	ի/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այ/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	լ	նք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	աք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	էք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	լ	ն/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	էի/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	էիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	էր/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	էինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	էիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	էին/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այի/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	ար/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	ային/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	լ	լիս	.
SFX	VA	լ	լիք/CHDEGEABINLOPP	.
SFX	VA	լ	լի/CHDEGEABINLOPP	.
SFX	VA	ել	ում	.
SFX	VA	ալ	ում	.
